Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-4] Notice of benefits to persons in
and persons entering military service. The adjutant general shall ensure
the giving of notice of the benefits accorded by this chapter to persons
entering the state military forces. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next